Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2235
Nursing programs; survey; report.

The board shall, through the executive director or other representative appointed by the board, survey all programs of nursing in the state at time intervals to be determined by the board through rules and regulations. Written reports of such surveys shall be submitted to the board. The board shall act on the report to grant or deny continuing approval of the program.

Laws 1953, c. 245, § 15(4), p. 844;

Laws 1975, LB 422, § 13;

Laws 1995, LB 563, § 27;

Laws 1999, LB 594, § 40;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,132.27;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 791.